Colorado statutes. TITLE 40 Utilities
ARTICLE 6
HEARINGS AND INVESTIGATIONS

Section

40-6-101. Proceedings - delegation of duties - rules.

The commission shall conduct its proceedings in such manner as will best conduce the proper dispatch of business and the ends of justice. All of the provisions of article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., shall apply to the work, business, proceedings, and functions of the commission, or any individual commissioner or administrative law judge; but where there is a specific statutory provision in this title applying to the commission, such specific statutory provision shall control as to the commission. For this purpose, any administrative law judge, as provided in this title, shall be deemed to be a hearing commissioner as that term is used in said article 4 of title 24, C.R.S. The commission may from time to time make or amend such general rules or orders as may be requisite for the order and regulation of proceedings before it, or before any individual commissioner or administrative law judge, including forms of notices and the service thereof. Any party to the proceeding may appear before the commission or any individual commissioner or administrative law judge and be heard. Every vote and official act of the commission, any individual commissioner, or an administrative law judge shall be entered of record and such record shall be made public upon the request of any party interested. All hearings before the commission, any individual commissioner, or an administrative law judge shall be public.

The commission may by order direct that any of its work, business, or functions under any provision of law, except functions vested solely in the commission under this title 40, be assigned or referred to an individual commissioner or to an administrative law judge to be designated by order for action. The commission may by order at any time amend, modify, supplement, or rescind any such assignment or reference. When an individual commissioner or an administrative law judge is unable to act upon any matter assigned or referred because of absence or other cause, the chair of the commission may designate another commissioner or administrative law judge, as the case may be, to serve temporarily until the commission otherwise orders.

Every case submitted to the commission for adjudication must be heard in the first instance by the commission unless, by rule, minute order, or written decision, the commission assigns the case to an administrative law judge or to an individual commissioner for hearing.

An individual commissioner or an administrative law judge has authority to hear and determine, order, certify, report, or otherwise act as to any work, business, or functions assigned or referred to such officer under the provisions of this title and, with respect thereto, has all the jurisdiction and powers conferred by law upon the commission and is subject to the same duties and obligations. The seal of the commission shall be the seal of an individual commissioner or administrative law judge. Except as otherwise provided in this title, any order, decision, or requirement of an individual commissioner or an administrative law judge with respect to any matter assigned or referred to such officer under subsection (2) of this section has the same force and effect and may be made and evidenced in the same manner as if made or taken by the commission.

All hearings and investigations before the commission, any individual commissioner, or any administrative law judge shall be governed by this title and by rules of practice and procedure adopted by the commission; and, in the conduct thereof, neither the commission, nor any individual commissioner, nor any administrative law judge shall be bound by the technical rules of evidence. No informality in any proceeding or in the manner of taking testimony before the commission, any commissioner, or any administrative law judge shall invalidate any order, decision, rule, or regulation made, approved, or confirmed by the commission.

Notwithstanding subsections (2) to (4) of this section, the commission may promulgate rules to authorize the delegation of its routine administrative transportation matters to commission staff. If the commission promulgates rules pursuant to this subsection (5), the commission shall define in rule the meaning of the term "routine administrative transportation matter".

Source:

L. 13:

p. 489, § 38.

C.L.

§ 2947.

CSA:

C. 137, § 38.

L. 45:

p. 527, § 4.

CRS 53:

§ 115-6-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-6-1.

L. 69:

p. 939, § 33.

L. 89:

Entire section amended, p. 1526, § 9, effective April 12.

L. 93:

(2) amended, p. 2063, § 16, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(3) amended, p. 1705, § 18, effective May 14.

L. 2019:

(2) amended and (5) added, (SB 19-236), ch. 359, p. 3311, § 15, effective May 30.

Cross references:

For conduct that may constitute the practice of law, see article 93 of title 13.

40-6-102. Service - fees - depositions - examination of witnesses.

The commission, each commissioner, an administrative law judge with respect to matters referred to such judge, and the director of the commission have power to issue notices, orders to satisfy or answer, summonses, subpoenas, and commissions to take the deposition of any witness whose testimony is required in any proceeding pending before the commission in like manner and to the same extent as courts of record. The process issued by the commission, any commissioner, an administrative law judge, or the director of the commission shall extend to all parts of the state and beyond the boundaries thereof as may be provided by law or the Colorado rules of civil procedure and may be served by any person authorized to serve process of courts of record, by any person designated for that purpose by the commission or a commissioner, or by first-class mail, postage prepaid, as provided in section 40-6-108. The person executing any such process shall receive such compensation as may be allowed by the commission, not to exceed the fees now prescribed by law for similar services, and such fees shall be paid in the same manner as provided for payment of the fees of witnesses.

In any investigation, inquiry, hearing, or other proceeding pending before the commission, any commissioner, or any administrative law judge of the commission, the depositions of witnesses may be taken, both within and without the state of Colorado, under the same circumstances and in the same manner as provided by the Colorado rules of civil procedure for the taking of depositions in courts of record.

A party to the record of any investigation, inquiry, hearing, or other proceeding pending before the commission, any commissioner, any administrative law judge of the commission, or a person for whose immediate benefit such investigation, hearing, or other proceeding is prosecuted or defended, or the directors, officers, superintendent, or managing agent of any corporation which is a party to the record in such investigation, hearing, or other proceeding may be examined upon the hearing thereof, or upon deposition, or both, as if under cross-examination at the instance of the commission or any adverse party, and for that purpose may be compelled, in the same manner and subject to the same rules for examination as any other witness, to testify; but the party calling for such examination shall not be concluded thereby but may rebut it by counter testimony.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 489, § 39.

C.L.

§ 2948.

CSA:

C. 137, § 39.

L. 45:

p. 527, § 5.

CRS 53:

§ 115-6-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-6-2.

L. 69:

p. 940, § 34.

L. 89:

Entire section amended, p. 1527, § 10, effective April 12.

L. 2003:

(1) amended, p. 1705, § 19, effective May 14.

Cross references:

For depositions and discovery, see Rules 26 to 37, Colorado rules of civil procedures; for service of process, see Rule 4(d), Colorado rules of civil procedure; for fees of sheriff for service of process, see § 30-1-104; for payment of fees of witnesses, see § 40-6-103.

40-6-103. Administration of oaths - compulsion of testimony - fees.

The commission, each commissioner, the director, and any administrative law judge as to matters referred to such judge have power to administer oaths, certify to all official acts, and issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses and the production of records, documents, and testimony in any inquiry, investigation, hearing, or proceeding in any part of the state. No subpoena shall be issued except upon good cause shown. Good cause shown shall consist of an affidavit stating with specificity the testimony, records, or documents sought and the relevance of such testimony, records, or documents to the proceedings of the commission. Each witness who appears by order of the commission, a commissioner, the director, or any administrative law judge shall receive for the witness' attendance the same fees and mileage allowed by law to a witness in civil cases, which amount shall be paid by the party at whose request such witness is subpoenaed. When any witness who has not been required to attend at the request of any party is subpoenaed, the witness' fees and mileage shall be paid from the funds appropriated for the use of the commission in the same manner as other expenses of the commission are paid. Any witness subpoenaed except one whose fees and mileage may be paid from the funds of the commission, at the time of service, may demand the fees to which the witness is entitled for travel to and from the place at which the witness is required to appear, and one day's attendance. If such witness demands such fees at the time of service, and they are not at that time paid or tendered, the witness shall not be required to attend, as directed in the subpoena. All fees and mileage to which any witness is entitled under the provisions of this section may be collected by action therefor instituted by the person to whom such fees are payable. No witness furnished with free transportation shall receive mileage for the distance the witness may have traveled on such free transportation.

The district court in and for the county or city and county in which any inquiry, investigation, hearing, or proceeding may be held by the commission, or any individual commissioner or administrative law judge, has the power to compel the attendance of witnesses, the giving of testimony, and the production of records or documents as required by any subpoenas issued by the commission, or any individual commissioner, the director, or any administrative law judge. The commission, individual commissioner, or an administrative law judge before whom the testimony is to be given or produced, in case of the failure or refusal of any witness to attend or testify or produce any records or documents required by such subpoena, may report to the district court in and for the county or city and county in which the proceeding is pending, by petition, setting forth that due notice has been given of the time and place of attendance of said witness or the production of said records or documents, that the witness has been subpoenaed in the manner prescribed in this title, and that the witness has failed or refused to attend or produce the records or documents required by the subpoena or has failed or refused to answer questions propounded to the witness in the course of such proceeding; and the commission, individual commissioner, or an administrative law judge may ask for an order of the court compelling the witness to attend and testify or produce or cause to be produced documentary evidence. No person so testifying shall be exempt from prosecution or punishment for any perjury in the first degree committed by such person in this testimony. Nothing in this section shall be construed as in any manner giving to any public utility immunity of any kind.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 489, § 40.

C.L.

§ 2949.

CSA:

C. 137, § 40.

CRS 53:

§ 115-6-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-6-3.

L. 69:

p. 940, § 35.

L. 72:

p. 566, § 40.

L. 83:

(1) amended, p. 1561, § 1, effective June 1.

L. 89:

Entire section amended, p. 1528, § 11, effective April 12.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 1706, § 20, effective May 14.

Cross references:

For perjury, see part 5 of article 8 of title 18; for fees of witnesses, see §§ 13-33-102 and 13-33-103.

40-6-104. Certified copies - evidence - orders.

Copies of all official documents, commission decisions, and orders on file with the commission, or documents filed or deposited according to law in the office of the commission, certified by a commissioner or by the director under the official seal of the commission to be true copies of the originals, shall be evidence in like manner as the originals and shall be treated and recognized as such by all courts of the state of Colorado.

Any order, decision, authorization, certificate, or entry, or a copy thereof, certified by a commissioner or by the director under the official seal of the commission to be a true copy of the original order, decision, authorization, certificate, or entry, may be filed for record in the office of the county clerk and recorder of any county or city and county in which is located the principal place of business of any public utility affected thereby or in which is situated any property of any such public utility, and such record shall impart notice of its provisions to all persons. A certificate under the seal of the commission that any such order, decision, authorization, or certificate has not been modified, stayed, suspended, or revoked may also be recorded in the same offices in the same manner and with like effect.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 491, § 41.

C.L.

§ 2950.

CSA:

C. 137, § 41.

CRS 53:

§ 115-6-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-6-4.

L. 69:

p. 941, § 36.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 1707, § 21, effective May 14.

40-6-105. Fees - copies of records - disposition.

The commission shall charge the following fees: For copies of papers and records not required to be certified or otherwise authenticated by the commission, twenty cents for each page; for certified copies of official documents and orders filed in its office, twenty cents for each page; and one dollar for every certificate under seal affixed thereto.

No fees shall be charged for copies of papers, records, or official documents furnished to public officers for use in their official capacity, but the commission may fix reasonable charges for publications issued under its authority. All fees charged under this section shall be collected by the commission, paid to the department of revenue, deposited in the office of the state treasurer, and credited to the public utilities commission fixed utility fund or the public utilities commission motor carrier fund, as the case may be.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 491, § 42.

C.L.

§ 2951.

CSA:

C. 137, § 42.

CRS 53:

§ 115-6-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-6-5.

L. 69:

p. 942, § 37.

40-6-106. Power to inspect books and accounts.

The commission, each commissioner, and any person employed by the commission shall have the right to inspect the records and documents of any public utility; and the commission, each commissioner, or any employee authorized to administer oaths has the power to examine under oath any officer, agent, or employee of such public utility in relation to the business and affairs of said public utility. Any person other than a commissioner demanding such inspection shall produce under the hand and seal of the commission his authority to make such inspection; and a written record of the testimony or statement so given under oath shall be made and filed with the commission.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 492, § 43.

C.L.

§ 2952.

CSA:

C. 137, § 43.

CRS 53:

§ 115-6-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-6-6.

L. 69:

p. 942, § 38.

40-6-107. Production of documents - transparency in planning for future acquisitions - rules.

The commission may require, by order served on any public utility in the manner provided in section 40-6-102 for the service of orders, the production within this state at such time and place as it may designate of any records and documents kept by the public utility in any office or place outside of this state, or, at its option, verified copies in lieu thereof, so that an examination of the records or documents may be made by the commission or under its direction.

To ensure transparency in the acquisition of power generation resources for the benefit of Colorado ratepayers and to promote fairness in electric utility competitive bidding processes, the commission shall, within ninety days after March 29, 2011, commence a rule-making proceeding to adopt rules, applicable after March 29, 2011, to require an investor-owned electric utility that is evaluating or has evaluated an existing or proposed electric generating facility as a potential resource, whether in connection with a commission proceeding or otherwise, to provide the owner or developer of the generating facility, upon request, with reasonable and timely access to the modeling inputs and assumptions that were used by the investor-owned public utility to evaluate the facility and that reasonably relate to that facility or to the transmission of electricity from that facility to the investor-owned public utility. Bidders in a competitive electric resource bidding process shall be permitted access to those modeling inputs and assumptions, as the modeling inputs and assumptions apply to the bidders' particular facility, in time to ensure that errors or omissions may be corrected before the competitive bidding process is completed. If it is determined that an error or omission, as defined by commission rule-making, exists in the investor-owned public utility's modeling, the commission shall require the investor-owned public utility to perform additional modeling to confirm that electric generating facilities are fairly and accurately represented in the results of any computer modeling performed by the investor-owned public utility.

In any commission proceeding regarding electric resource planning or otherwise relating to the acquisition of, contracting for, or retirement of electric generation facilities, the commission shall establish procedures regarding the designation and approval of information as highly confidential that protect the public interest and assure that ratepayers receive the benefits of competition and transparency while protecting the trade secrets of computer modeling software producers, independent bidders, and the investor-owned public utility.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 493, § 44.

C.L.

§ 2953.

CSA:

C. 137, § 44.

CRS 53:

§ 115-6-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-6-7.

L. 69:

p. 943, § 39.

L. 2011:

Entire section amended, (HB 11-1262), ch. 75, p. 206, § 1, effective March 29.

Cross references:

For service of orders, see Rule 4(d), Colorado rules of civil procedure.

40-6-108. Complaints - service - notice of hearing.

Complaint may be made by the commission on its own motion or by any corporation, person, chamber of commerce, or board of trade, or by any civic, commercial, mercantile, traffic, agricultural, or manufacturing association or organization, or by any body politic or municipal corporation by petition or complaint in writing, setting forth any act or thing done or omitted to be done by any public utility, including any rule, regulation, or charge heretofore established or fixed by or for any public utility, in violation, or claimed to be in violation, of any provision of law or of any order or rule of the commission.

No complaint shall be entertained by the commission, except upon its own motion, as to the reasonableness of any rates or charges of any gas, electric, water, or telephone public utility, unless the same is signed by the mayor or the president or chairman of the board of trustees or a majority of the council, commission, or other legislative body of the county, city and county, city, or town, if any, within which the alleged violation occurred, or not less than twenty-five customers or prospective customers of such public utility.

All matters upon which complaint may be founded may be joined in one hearing, and no motion shall be entertained against a complaint for misjoinder of causes of action or grievances or misjoinder or nonjoinder of parties. In any review by the courts of orders or decisions of the commission, the same rule shall apply with regard to the joinder of causes and parties.

The commission is not required to dismiss any complaint because of the absence of direct damage to the complainant.

Upon the filing of any complaint, the commission shall cause a copy thereof to be served upon the person complained of, together with an order requiring such defendant to satisfy or answer said complaint within a time to be fixed by the commission.

Notice of all applications, petitions, and orders instituting investigations or inquiries shall be given to all persons, firms, or corporations who, in the opinion of the commission, are interested in, or who would be affected by, the granting or denial of any such application, petition, or other proceeding. Except for good cause shown, any person desiring to file an objection or intervene in or participate as a party in any such proceeding shall file his or her objection or petition for leave to intervene or, under such rules as the commission may prescribe, file other appropriate pleadings to become a party, within thirty days after the date of the notice, or such lesser time as the commission may prescribe. No final action shall be taken by the commission in any proceeding during the time any such filing is permitted.

Any public utility giving notice of a proposed gas or electric tariff shall serve such notice upon the Colorado energy office or its successor agency. The office shall be granted leave to intervene as a matter of right, upon a timely filing of a petition or other pleading in accordance with this section, in adjudicatory matters affecting gas or electric utilities; except that the office shall not be a party to any individual complaint between a utility and an individual.

Service in all applications, petitions, complaints, hearings, investigations, and other proceedings pending before the commission may be made upon any person upon whom a summons may be served in accordance with the provisions of the Colorado rules of civil procedure, or may be made personally or by first-class mail. In all cases wherein service is obtained by mail by the commission, the certificate of the director of the commission of such mailing shall be prima facie evidence that service has been obtained, and the time fixed in any order or notice shall commence to run from the date of mailing as shown in such certificate. The mailing of any notice or other paper by any other party to a proceeding shall be evidenced by the certificate of the person mailing such notice or other paper, and the time fixed in any such notice or other paper shall commence to run from the date of mailing as shown in such certificate.

The commission shall fix the time when and place where any hearing required by this title or by article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., will be had upon any application, complaint, petition, investigation, or other proceeding, and shall serve notice thereof to the parties not less than ten days before the time set for such hearing, unless the commission finds that public interest or necessity requires that any such hearing be held at an earlier date. The commission shall hold a hearing and issue a final order in complaint cases within two hundred ten days after the filing of testimony and exhibits by the complainant. In extraordinary circumstances, the commission may extend the time an additional ninety days following a hearing in which such extraordinary circumstances are established. The complainant may waive the time limits established in this section, in which case the time limits are not binding on the commission.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 493, § 45.

C.L.

§ 2954.

CSA:

C. 137, § 45.

L. 45:

p. 528, § 6.

CRS 53:

§ 115-6-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-6-8.

L. 69:

p. 943, § 40.

L. 89:

(2) and (4) amended, p. 1529, § 12, effective April 12.

L. 93:

(4) amended, p. 2064, § 17, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(3) amended, p. 1707, § 22, effective May 14.

L. 2008:

(2) amended, p. 1796, § 14, effective July 1.

L. 2012:

(2)(b) amended, (HB 12-1315), ch. 224, p. 981, § 50, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For service of summons, see Rule 4(e), Colorado rules of civil procedure.

40-6-109. Hearings - orders - record - review - representation of entities in nonadjudicatory proceedings.

At the time fixed for any hearing before the commission, any commissioner, or an administrative law judge, or, at the time to which the same may have been continued, the applicant, petitioner, complainant, the person, firm, or corporation complained of, and such persons, firms, or corporations as the commission may allow to intervene and such persons, firms, or corporations as will be interested in or affected by any order that may be made by the commission in such proceeding and who shall have become parties to the proceeding shall be entitled to be heard, examine and cross-examine witnesses, and introduce evidence. A full and complete record of all proceedings had before the commission, any commissioner, or an administrative law judge in any formal hearing and all testimony shall be taken down by any reporter appointed by the commission or, as deemed appropriate by the commission, a commissioner, or an administrative law judge, as applicable, recorded electronically. All parties in interest shall be entitled to be heard in person or by attorney.

Whenever any hearing, investigation, or other proceeding is assigned to an administrative law judge or individual commissioner for hearing, the administrative law judge or individual commissioner, after the conclusion of said hearing, shall promptly transmit to the commission the record and exhibits of said proceeding together with a written recommended decision which shall contain his findings of fact and conclusions thereon, together with the recommended order or requirement. Copies thereof shall be served upon the parties, who may file exceptions thereto; but if no exceptions are filed within twenty days after service upon the parties, or within such extended period of time as the commission may authorize in writing (copies of any such extension to be served upon the parties), or unless such decision is stayed within such time by the commission upon its own motion, such recommended decision shall become the decision of the commission and subject to the provisions of section 40-6-115. The commission upon its own motion may and where exceptions are filed shall reconsider the matter, either upon the same record or after further hearing, and such recommended decision shall thereupon be stayed or postponed pending final determination thereof by the commission. The commission may adopt, reject, or modify the findings of fact and conclusions of such individual commissioner or administrative law judge or, after examination of the record of any such proceeding, enter its decision and order therein without regard to the findings of fact and conclusions of any individual commissioner or administrative law judge. Any commissioner to whom a proceeding may be so assigned shall not be disabled thereby from participating with the commission in the final decision.

After the conclusion of any hearing, investigation, or proceeding before the commission, the commission shall make and file its decision. The decision shall be a report in writing in which the commission shall state its findings of fact and conclusions thereon together with its order or requirement. The decision, under the seal of the commission, shall be served upon all parties and made available to all participants in the proceeding.

Unless otherwise provided in this title, all decisions of the commission shall become effective upon a day to be fixed by the commission in any such decision and shall continue in force either for a period which may be designated therein or until changed or abrogated by the commission. Decisions containing negative orders shall be effective on the date of entry thereof, unless otherwise provided in any such decision. If an order or requirement cannot, in the judgment of the commission, be complied with within the time prescribed therein, the commission, on application made within such time and for good cause shown, may extend the time for compliance fixed in its decision.

The commission may by general rule or regulation provide for the taking of evidence in uncontested or unopposed proceedings by affidavit or otherwise, without the necessity of a formal oral hearing. Such shortened or informal proceedings shall otherwise be subject to all of the provisions of this title. Upon its own motion the commission may and upon request of a party timely made the commission shall assign any such uncontested or unopposed proceeding for hearing.

The commission may make the initial decision in cases where it has not presided at the taking of evidence, and the recommended decision of the individual commissioner or administrative law judge may be omitted in any case in which the commission finds upon the record that due and timely execution of its functions imperatively and unavoidably so requires.

The commission may by general rule or regulation provide for appearances pro se by, or for representation by authorized officers or regular employees of, the commission's staff, corporations, partnerships, limited liability companies, sole proprietorships, and other legal entities in certain nonadjudicatory matters before the commission.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 494, § 46.

C.L.

§ 2955.

CSA:

C. 137, § 46.

L. 45:

p. 529, § 7.

CRS 53:

§ 115-6-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-6-9.

L. 69:

p. 944, § 41.

L. 89:

(1), (2), and (4) to (6) amended, p. 1530, § 13, effective April 12.

L. 93:

(7) added, p. 2064, § 18, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(3) amended, p. 1796, § 15, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(1) amended, (HB 09-1118), ch. 130, p. 563, § 12, effective August 5.

40-6-109.5. Hearings on applications - time limits for decisions.

Whenever an application of any kind is filed with the commission and is accompanied by the applicant's supporting testimony or a detailed summary of the supporting testimony, together with exhibits, if any, the commission shall issue its decision on the application no later than one hundred twenty days after the application is deemed complete as prescribed by rules promulgated by the commission. If the commission finds that additional time is required, it may, by separate order, extend the time for decision by an additional period not to exceed one hundred thirty days.

In the case of any application not accompanied by prefiled testimony and exhibits, the commission shall issue its decision no later than two hundred fifty days after the application is deemed complete as prescribed by the commission's rules.

The time limits specified in subsections (1) and (2) of this section may be waived by the applicant and, if so waived, shall not be binding on the commission.

The commission, in particular cases, under extraordinary conditions and after notice and a hearing at which the existence of extraordinary conditions is established, may extend the time limits specified in subsections (1) and (2) of this section for a period not to exceed an additional one hundred thirty days.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire section added, p. 2064, § 19, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

(1) and (4) amended, (SB 19-236), ch. 359, p. 3312, § 16, effective May 30.

L. 2021:

(2) amended, (SB 21-272), ch. 220, p. 1162, § 9, effective June 10.

40-6-110. Complaint by utility.

Any public utility has a right to complain on any grounds upon which complaints are allowed to be filed by other parties, and the same procedure shall be adopted and followed as in other cases.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 495, § 47.

C.L.

§ 2956.

CSA:

C. 137, § 47.

CRS 53:

§ 115-6-10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-6-10.

L. 69:

p. 946, § 42.